Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2920HZ (1) 91 ss/ko H.F. 977 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249A.5 Ground emergency medical 1 transportation ââ expansion. 2 1. The department shall employ dedicated staff for the sole 3 purpose of expanding enrollment in the ground emergency medical 4 transportation program established pursuant to 2018 Iowa Acts, 5 ch. 1054. The staff shall provide technical assistance, 6 actuary support, and Medicaid enrollment assistance to any 7 eligible ground emergency medical transportation provider 8 that seeks participation in the ground emergency medical 9 transportation program. The department shall develop the 10 ground emergency medical transportation program to ensure 11 access to emergency medical services throughout the state. 12 2. The department shall submit a report to the general 13 assembly by December 15 of each year regarding the ground 14 emergency medical transportation program, which shall 15 include information on the number of ground emergency medical 16 transportation providers enrolled in the ground emergency 17 medical transportation program, the number of ground emergency 18 medical transportation providers that the department provided 19 assistance to in the prior fiscal year, and barriers to 20 enrollment in the ground emergency medical transportation 21 program. 22